North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 12. Primary Forest Product Assessment Act. [Repealed]

§§ 113A-189 through 13A-196.

Recodified as Article 84 of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-1025

through

G.S. 106-1032

, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(ii), effective July 1, 2011.

§§ 113A-197 through 113A-201.

Reserved for future codification purposes.